Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 223. JEFFERSON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER C. REGULATION OF LAKE SABINE BY CITY OF PORT ARTHUR

Sec. 223.021. RECREATIONAL USE OF LAKE SABINE. The governing body of the city of Port Arthur, with respect to the waters of Lake Sabine within the corporate limits of the city, may designate or otherwise regulate by ordinance certain areas of the lake as bathing, fishing, swimming, recreational, or other restricted areas and may adopt rules relating to that regulation.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 223.023. REGULATION OF BOAT SPEEDS. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, the governing body of the city of Port Arthur may by ordinance regulate the speed of boats on Lake Sabine within the corporate limits of the city.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.